Utah statutes.
59-2-1342.   Assessment and sale of property after attachment of county tax
lien.
(1)  Property against which a property tax delinquency exists shall be
assessed in subsequent years for taxes in the same manner as if no delinquency
existed.
(2)  The rights of any person purchasing the property from the county at tax
sale provided under Section 59-2-1351.1 are subject to the right of the county
under any subsequent assessment.
